District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.162

Eligibility requirements.

An applicant for licensure as a real estate broker shall establish to the satisfaction of the Board of Real Estate that the applicant:

(1)

Meets all of the requirements for real estate salesperson under part N of this subchapter; and

(2)

Has been licensed and actively engaged in business as a real estate broker or salesperson in the District or elsewhere the 2 years immediately preceding the date on which the application for a real estate broker license is filed, or equivalent experience acceptable to the Board.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.162.